src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
! ============================= !
!! !!!Noun morphological lexica !
! ============================= !

! ===== !
! Nouns !
! ===== !

LEXICON Vocative   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
+N+Voc: # ;

LEXICON Noun1-IS_PTC-OM !!≈ * __@CODE@__ is to provide deverbal nouns with +Der/ӧм tags
+V+Der/ӧм: N_ ;

LEXICON Noun1-IS_PTC-AN !!≈ * __@CODE@__
+V+Der/ан: N_ ;

LEXICON Noun1-IS_PTC-YSJ !!≈ * __@CODE@__
+V+Der/ысь: N_ ;

LEXICON N-DOR ! мӧдладор The Russian is an adverbial phrase
+Der/дор: N_ ;

LEXICON N-VYV ! тулысвыв The Russian is an adverbial phrase
+Der/выв: N_ ;

LEXICON Noun1-F !
+Src/F: N_ ;

LEXICON Noun1-R-RY !
+Err/Orth:ь N_ ;  ! This deals with январь
           N_ ; ! This is the new proper spelling январ

LEXICON Noun1-SYT-STY !
+Err/Orth:ть N_ ;  ! This deals with гӧсть
:ьт         N_ ; ! This is the new proper spelling гӧсьт


LEXICON N-KINDRED_
 N_ ;
+N+PxSg1+Assoc+Pl:%>ӧяс CASEPOSSLEX ;
+N+PxSg2+Assoc+Pl:%>ыдъяс CASEPOSSLEX ;
+N+PxSg3+Assoc+Pl:%>ысъяс CASEPOSSLEX ;

LEXICON N-PROFESSION_
 N_ ;
+N+Der/ал0@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:%>%{ая%}л@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ V_ШУНЫ ; !! таксисталӧ 
!! Basic nouns.

!! The lexicon for basic nouns is {{ N_ }}

LEXICON N_
+N: NMN_ ;

LEXICON Noun1 !! This should be phased out 2013-05-07
 N_ ;
LEXICON N_RU-ӦЙ
+Use/SpellNoSugg:  N_ ;

LEXICON NMN_
 R ;
+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX ;
+Pl:%>ъяс CASEPOSSLEX ;


LEXICON Noun1-JM ! понйыс, понмыс
+N+Cmp:м R ;
+N+Sg:м CASEPOSSLEX ;
+N+Cmp:й R ;
+N+Sg:й CASEPOSSLEX ;
+N+Pl:%>ъяс CASEPOSSLEX ;

!! subsequent Cns vs Vow
LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC !!= * @CODE@ 
+N: NMN_PARAGOGIC ;
LEXICON NMN_PARAGOGIC !!= * @CODE@ 
+Cmp:%^Close R ;
+Sg:%^Close CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END ;
+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_VOW ;
+Pl:%^Close%>ъяс CASEPOSSLEX ;

LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC-V/L !!= * @CODE@ ныв:ны нылыс
+N: NMN_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;
LEXICON NMN_PARAGOGIC-V/L !!= * @CODE@ ныв:ны нылыс
:л NMN_PARAGOGIC ;

+Err/Orth+Dial/л+Cmp:л R ;
+Err/Orth+Dial/л+Sg:л CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END ;
+Err/Orth+Dial/в+Sg:л%^Close CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_VOW ;
+Err/Orth+Dial/л+Pl:л%>ъяс CASEPOSSLEX ;


LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC-J !!= * @CODE@ ав:ав авйыс
+N: NMN_PARAGOGIC-J ;
LEXICON NMN_PARAGOGIC-J !!= * @CODE@ ав:ав авйыс
:й NMN_PARAGOGIC ;

LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC-K !!= * @CODE@ кытш:кытш кытшкыс
+N: NMN_PARAGOGIC-K ;
LEXICON NMN_PARAGOGIC-K !!= * @CODE@ кытш:кытш кытшкыс
:к NMN_PARAGOGIC ;

LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC-M !!= * @CODE@ зон:зон зонмыс
+N: NMN_PARAGOGIC-M ;
LEXICON NMN_PARAGOGIC-M !!= * @CODE@ зон:зон зонмыс
:м N_PARAGOGIC ;

LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC-T !!= * @CODE@ зеп:зеп зептыс
+N: NMN_PARAGOGIC-T ;
LEXICON NMN_PARAGOGIC-T !!= * @CODE@ зеп:зеп зептыс
:т N_PARAGOGIC ;

LEXICON N_END-IN-DD1 !!= * @CODE@ гадь:гад гаддьыс
+N: NMN_END-IN-DD1 ;
LEXICON NMN_END-IN-DD1 !!= * @CODE@ автомобиль:автомобил автомобильыс
:дь NMN_PARAGOGIC ;

LEXICON N_END-IN-DDZ !!= * @CODE@ кыдз:кыд
+N: NMN_END-IN-DDZ ;
LEXICON NMN_END-IN-DDZ !!= * @CODE@ кыдз:кыд
:дз NMN_PARAGOGIC ;

LEXICON N_END-IN-LL1 !!= * @CODE@ моль:мол молльӧ
+N: NMN_END-IN-LL1 ;
LEXICON NMN_END-IN-LL1 !!= * @CODE@ моль:мол молльӧ
:ль NMN_PARAGOGIC ;



LEXICON N_END-IN-J !!= * @CODE@ абай:аба абайыс
+N+Cmp:й R ;
+N+Sg:й CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END ;
+N+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_Я ;
+N+Sg:й CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_Ӧ ;
+N+Pl:й%>яс CASEPOSSLEX ;


LEXICON N_END-IN-Ч/ДЗ !!= * @CODE@ автомобиль:автомобил автомобильыс
+N: NMN_END-IN-Ч/ДЗ ;
LEXICON NMN_END-IN-Ч/ДЗ !!= * @CODE@ автомобиль:автомобил автомобильыс
+Cmp: R ;
+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END ;
+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_VOW ;
+Pl:%>ьяс CASEPOSSLEX ;

LEXICON N_END-IN-Ь !!= * @CODE@ автомобиль:автомобил автомобильыс
+N+Cmp:ь R ;
+N+Sg:ь CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END ;
+N+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_Я ;
+N+Sg:ь CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_Ӧ ;
+N+Pl:%>ьяс CASEPOSSLEX ; !! 2015-09-04 change to ь%>яс after xfst rules are removed



LEXICON NounLA ! ӧтила
N_ ; ! Difference betw N_ and NounLA still to be documented.

LEXICON NounMort
N_ ; ! Difference betw N_ and NounMort still to be documented.

LEXICON NounSG ! м орт
+N+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX ;

LEXICON NounPi ! пи These have a unique  pl marker ян.
+N+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX ;
+N+Pl:%>ян CASEPOSSLEX ;


LEXICON NounPL ! бедьторъяс
+N+Pl: CASEPOSSLEX ; ! here, %>ъяс is put as part of the stem
! Very many plural nouns do not have this tag. We could change яс-final
! nouns from N_ to NounPL, I guess.

LEXICON NounPOSS ! чой niece, nephew
N_ ; ! Declension to be determined.

LEXICON FIRST
+Cmp: # ;


! =================== !
!! !!Inflectional lexica
! =================== !


!! All nouns follow one contlex "N_"
!! to begin with here is simply a list of all variant
!! with no more variants beyond:

! Numbers
! Case + Poss or Poss+Case


LEXICON CASEPOSSLEX !!≈ * __@CODE@__

 DERIVEDADJ ;    ! Deriving prenominal adjectives, республикаса
CASEPOSSLEX-afterDerivation ;

LEXICON CASEPOSSLEX-afterDerivation
 CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END ;
  CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_VOW ;

LEXICON CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END
+Nom: K ;
+Acc: K ; !ZERO marker
	CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END-MINUS-ZERO-END ;
