src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
адама:адама FIRST  "" ;
ай% пон:ай% понй Noun1-JM  "uroskoira" ;
анна% син:анна% син N_PARAGOGIC-M  "keto-orvokki" ;
арта:арта NounMort  "viranomainen" ;
башмак% пӧв:башмак% пӧ N_PARAGOGIC-V/L  "yksi kenkä (parista)" ;
бледӧдӧм:бледӧдӧм Noun1-IS_PTC-OM  "" ;
бокӧвӧй% йӧз:бокӧвӧй% йӧз NounSG  "vieraat ihmiset" ;
болкъя% додь:болкъя% дод N_END-IN-DD1  "katettu reki" ;
ботан% син:ботан% син N_PARAGOGIC-M  "kalaverkon silmä" ;
бӧръянтор:бӧръянтор N_PARAGOGIC-J  "" ;
вадор% бадь:вадор% бад N_END-IN-DD1  "rantapaju" ;
вадорладор% видз:вадорладор% вид N_END-IN-DDZ  "" ;
важ% йӧз:важ% йӧз N_  "esi-isät" ;
вакуль:вакул N_END-IN-LL1  "vetehinen" ;
варышъяс:варышъяс NounPL  "" ;
ваӧн% босьтлан% мусин:ваӧн% босьтлан% мусин N_PARAGOGIC-M  "letto??" ;
велӧдысь:велӧдыс N_END-IN-Ь  "opettaja" ;
верстьӧ% йӧз:верстьӧ% йӧз NounSG  "aikuiset" ;
веськыдвыв:веськыдвы N_PARAGOGIC-V/L  "oikea puoli" ;
ветлан% туй:ветлан% ту N_END-IN-J  "polku" ;
ветранеч:ветранеч N_END-IN-Ч/ДЗ  "" ;
вешъян:вешъян Noun1-IS_PTC-AN  "" ;
видз+Hom2:вид N_END-IN-DDZ  "niitty" ;
виж% бадь:виж% бад N_END-IN-DD1  "paju" ;
виж% паськӧма:виж% паськӧма NounMort  "keltapukuinen??" ;
вирсин:вирсин N_PARAGOGIC-M  "särki" ;
воантор:воантор N_PARAGOGIC-J  "" ;
вожа% гыжъяяс:вожа% гыжъяяс NounPL  "sorkkaeläimet" ;
вуж% додь:вуж% дод N_END-IN-DD1  "purilaat" ;
вузӧс% пес:вузӧс% пес N_PARAGOGIC-K  "myytävät polttopuut" ;
вылысладор:вылысладор N-DOR  "" ;
вӧв:вӧ N_PARAGOGIC-V/L  "hevonen" ;
вӧйтӧм:вӧйтӧм Noun1-IS_PTC-OM  "" ;
вӧр% ю% адз:вӧр% ю% ад N_END-IN-DDZ  "" ;
гач:гач N_END-IN-Ч/ДЗ  "housut" ;
грабитысь:грабитысь Noun1-IS_PTC-YSJ  "" ;
грамота:грамота N_  "diplomi" ;
гулюпи:гулюпи NounPi  "" ;
гулюпиян:гулюпиян Noun1-IS_PTC-AN  "" ;
гут-лӧдз:гут-лӧд N_END-IN-DDZ  "" ;
гӧгралысь% ва% гагъяс:гӧгралысь% ва% гагъяс NounPL  "hopeasepät" ;
гӧлень:гӧлен N_END-IN-Ь  "" ;
гӧна% бобув:гӧна% бобу N_PARAGOGIC-V/L  "karvakehrääjät" ;
гӧп:гӧп N_PARAGOGIC-T  "kuoppa" ;
гӧсьт:гӧс Noun1-SYT-STY  "" ;
дадь:дад N_END-IN-DD1  "kelkka" ;
дежурнӧй:дежурнӧ N_END-IN-J  "päivystäjä" ;
дзоля% пипу% сиргаг:дзоля% пипу% сиргаг N_PARAGOGIC-J  "" ;
дуль:дул N_END-IN-LL1  "sylki" ;
ерӧмакань_кукань_гач:ерӧмакань% кукань% гач N_END-IN-Ч/ДЗ  "" ;
жиганпиян:жиганпи NounPi  "" ;
заработайтӧм:заработайтӧм Noun1-IS_PTC-OM  "" ;
зон:зон N_PARAGOGIC-M  "" ;
зырасян:зырасян Noun1-IS_PTC-AN  "" ;
зырымбедь:зырымбед N_END-IN-DD1  "räkänokka" ;
изсир:изсир N_  "meripihka" ;
йывладор:йывладор N-DOR  "" ;
йӧра% яй:йӧра% я N_END-IN-J  "hirvenliha" ;
капуста% пытш:капуста% пытш N_PARAGOGIC-K  "kaalikoi" ;
катшасин:катшасин N_PARAGOGIC-M  "kehräsaunio" ;
кепысь:кепыс N_END-IN-Ь  "käsineet" ;
кимльӧскивыв:кимльӧскивыл N-VYV  "" ;
киняув:киняу N_PARAGOGIC-V/L  "kainalo" ;
кляп:кляп N_PARAGOGIC-T  "" ;
кодзувкот% сёйысь% гаг:кодзувкот% сёйысь% гаг N_PARAGOGIC-J  "" ;
коз% коль:коз% кол N_END-IN-LL1  "kuusenkäpy" ;
кокмӧдз:кокмӧдз N_END-IN-Ч/ДЗ  "" ;
крига:крига N_  "vata" ;
кроликпи:кроликпи NounPi  "" ;
кудз% гадь:кудз% гад N_END-IN-DD1  "virtsarakko" ;
кузь% бордъя% лэбачьяс:кузь% бордъя% лэбачьяс NounPL  "kiitäjälinnut" ;
кузь% уска% лӧдз:кузь% уска% лӧд N_END-IN-DDZ  "paarma" ;
кульман:кульман Noun1-IS_PTC-AN  "kutu-" ;
курӧг% той:курӧг% то N_END-IN-J  "kanatäi??" ;
кымльӧскивыв:кымльӧскивыл N-VYV  "" ;
кӧр% воль:кӧр% вол N_END-IN-LL1  "porontalja" ;
логическӧй:логическӧ N_END-IN-J  "looginen" ;
лолалан% органъяс:лолалан% органъяс NounPL  "hengityselimet" ;
ломзян:ломзян Noun1-IS_PTC-AN  "" ;
лоп:лоп N_PARAGOGIC-T  "perna" ;
лос:лос N_PARAGOGIC-K  "" ;
лун% сюзь:лун% сюз N_END-IN-Ь  "hiiripöllö" ;
лунйӧм:лунйӧм Noun1-IS_PTC-OM  "" ;
лым:лым NounMort  "lumimies" ;
льӧм:льӧм N_PARAGOGIC-J  "tuomi" ;
лэччандор:лэччандор N-DOR  "" ;
люньпи:люньпи NounPi  "hauensintti" ;
лӧдз:лӧд N_END-IN-DDZ  "paarma" ;
маргарин:маргарин N_  "" ;
массӧвӧй% юӧр% средствояс:массӧвӧй% юӧр% средствояс NounPL  "joukkoviestimet" ;
матич:матич N_END-IN-Ч/ДЗ  "laipionkannatin" ;
морттуй:мортту N_END-IN-J  "käytös" ;
морӧс% зеп:морӧс% зеп N_PARAGOGIC-T  "" ;
мувыв:мувыл N-VYV  "" ;
мупытш:мупытш N_PARAGOGIC-K  "" ;
мусин:мусин N_PARAGOGIC-M  "multa" ;
нырвыв:нырвыл N-VYV  "" ;
ньыв% пу% пес:ньыв% пу% пес N_PARAGOGIC-K  "pihtahalot" ;
ньылӧм% боль:ньылӧм% бол N_END-IN-LL1  "hikipisara" ;
ньӧбӧмтор:ньӧбӧмтор N_PARAGOGIC-J  "" ;
нёров:нёро N_PARAGOGIC-V/L  "" ;
овман:овман Noun1-IS_PTC-AN  "" ;
олысь:олыс N_END-IN-Ь  "asuja" ;
омӧля% вермысь:омӧля% вермысь NounMort  "invalidi" ;
павчас:павчас N_  "" ;
паськӧдӧм:паськӧдӧм Noun1-IS_PTC-OM  "" ;
пельӧсладор:пельӧсладор N-DOR  "" ;
поднос:поднос Noun1-F  "" ;
пододеяльник:пододеяльник Noun1-F  "" ;
помвыв:помвыл N-VYV  "" ;
помеч:помеч N_END-IN-Ч/ДЗ  "talkoot" ;
пон:пон Noun1-JM  "koira" ;
понӧльпиян:понӧльпи NounPi  "" ;
потш:потш N_PARAGOGIC-K  "aidas" ;
рак% сямаяс:рак% сямаяс NounPL  "äyriäiset" ;
ректалӧм:ректалӧм Noun1-IS_PTC-OM  "" ;
розь:роз N_END-IN-Ь  "reikä" ;
руй:ру N_END-IN-J  "" ;
рытъядор:рытъядор N-DOR  "" ;
рытыввыв:рытыввы N_PARAGOGIC-V/L  "länsi" ;
свитер:свитер Noun1-F  "villapaita" ;
сдача:сдача Noun1-F  "luovutus" ;
секунд:секунд Noun1-F  "sekunti" ;
семилетка:семилетка Noun1-F  "seitsenvuotissunnitelma" ;
сенаж:сенаж Noun1-F  "" ;
сера% лӧдз:сера% лӧд N_END-IN-DDZ  "" ;
сервиз:сервиз Noun1-F  "astiasto" ;
серпасалантор:серпасалантор N_PARAGOGIC-J  "" ;
сильӧпиян:сильӧпи NounPi  "" ;
син:син N_PARAGOGIC-M  "silmä" ;
синва% моль:синва% мол N_END-IN-LL1  "" ;
сос% пӧв:сос% пӧл NounSG  "hiha" ;
сьылΙтшуп:сьылΙтшуп N_PARAGOGIC-T  "säkä" ;
сьылі:сьылі N_  "kaula" ;
сьӧд% ош:сьӧд% ош N_PARAGOGIC-K  "kauluskarhu" ;
сьӧмтӧм% гыч:сьӧмтӧм% гыч N_END-IN-Ч/ДЗ  "" ;
сюмалӧм:сюмалӧм Noun1-IS_PTC-OM  "" ;
сӧп% гадь:сӧп% гад N_END-IN-DD1  "sappirakko" ;
том% йӧз:том% йӧз NounSG  "nuoriso" ;
торъя:торъя NounMort  "" ;
туй% морт:туй NounMort  "matkustaja" ;
тулысъявыв:тулысъявыл N-VYV  "" ;
турунвиж% юрсигусь:турунвиж% юрсигус N_END-IN-Ь  "viherukonkorento" ;
тшуп:тшуп N_PARAGOGIC-T  "" ;
тышладор:тышладор N-DOR  "" ;
тіпиктан:тіпиктан Noun1-IS_PTC-AN  "" ;
уліладор:уліладор N-DOR  "" ;
уркайпи:уркайпи NounPi  "" ;
ус:ус N_PARAGOGIC-K  "" ;
чаль:чал N_END-IN-LL1  "pikkusormi" ;
чап:чап N_PARAGOGIC-T  "" ;
чегӧмтор:чегӧмтор N_PARAGOGIC-J  "" ;
чери-яй:чери-я N_END-IN-J  "" ;
чильйыв:чильйы N_PARAGOGIC-V/L  "" ;
шабді% чуль:шабді% чул N_END-IN-LL1  "" ;
шеп:шеп N_PARAGOGIC-T  "tähkä" ;
шодз:шод N_END-IN-DDZ  "" ;
шӧр% морт:шӧр NounMort  "teoksen keskeinen hahmo" ;
ыззян:ыззян Noun1-IS_PTC-AN  "" ;
эжсьӧм:эжсьӧм Noun1-IS_PTC-OM  "" ;
эскана% морт:эскана NounMort  "akkreditoitu edustaja" ;
югыдладор:югыдладор N-DOR  "" ;
юралысь% врач:юралысь% врач N_END-IN-Ч/ДЗ  "johtava lääkäri" ;
юридическӧй% кывкутысь:юридическӧй% кывкутыс N_END-IN-Ь  "juridinen henkilö" ;
юӧр% разӧдысь% органъяс:юӧр% разӧдысь% органъяс NounPL  "tiedotusvälineet" ;
языкознание:языкознание N_  "kielitiede" ;
яйвыв:яйвыл N-VYV  "" ;
ёжпи:ёжпи NounPi  "" ;
ӧтсорвыв:ӧтсорвыл N-VYV  "" ;
